Louisiana, session 2026, HB152.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:964(Schedule I)(A)(108) through (120) are hereby enacted to read
as follows:
§964. Composition of schedules
Schedules I, II, III, IV, and V shall, unless and until added pursuant to R.S.
40:962, consist of the following drugs or other substances, by whatever official
name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated:
SCHEDULE I
A. Opiates. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule,
any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, or salts of
isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of such isomers, esters, ethers,
or salts is possible within the specific chemical designation:
* * *
*(108) N-Pyrrolidino metonitazene (2-[(4-methoxyphenyl)methyl]-5-nitro-1-
[2-(pyrrolidino-1-yl)ethyl]-1H-benzimidazole)
*(109) N-Pyrrolidino protonitazene (2-[(4-propoxyphenyl)methyl]-5-nitro-1-
[2-(pyrrolidino-1-yl)ethyl]-1H-benzimidazole)
*(110) Beta-Methylacetyl fentanyl (N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylacetamide)
*(111) Para-Chlorofentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-[1-(2-phenethyl)-4-
piperidinyl]propanamide)
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 152 ENROLLED
*(112) Para-fluoro valeryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-
phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)pentanamide)
*(113) Tetrahydrothiofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenyltetrahydrothiophene-2-carboxamide)
*(114) Ethyleneoxynitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-[(2,3-dihydrobenzofuran-5-
yl)methyl]-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazole-1-ethanamine)
*(115) 5-Methyl etodesnitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-[(4-ethoxyphenyl)methyl]-5-
methyl-1H-benzimidazole-1-ethanamine)
*(116) N,N-Dimethylamino etonitazene (N,N-dimethyl-2-[(4-
ethoxyphenyl)methyl]-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazole-1-ethanamine)
*(117) N-Desethyl etonitazene (N-ethyl-2-[(4-ethoxyphenyl)methyl]-5-nitro-
1H-benzimidazole-1-ethanamine)
*(118) Methylenedioxynitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-[(1,3-benzodioxol-5-
yl)methyl]-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazole-1-ethanamine)
*(119) N-Pyrrolidino isotonitazene (2-[(4-isopropoxyphenyl)methyl]-5-
nitro-1-[2-(pyrrolidino-1-yl)ethyl]-1H-benzimidazole)
*(120) N-Desethyl protonitazene (N-ethyl-2-[(4-propoxyphenyl)methyl]-5-
nitro-1H-benzimidazole-1-ethanamine)
* * *
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
arrange in alphabetical order and renumber the new entries provided in R.S.
40:964(Schedule I) as amended by this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.